Utah statutes.
20A-1-511.   Midterm vacancies on local school boards.
(1) (a)  A local school board shall fill vacancies on the board by
appointment, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2).
(b)  If the board fails to make an appointment within 30 days after a vacancy
occurs, the county legislative body, or municipal legislative body in a city
district, shall fill the vacancy by appointment.
(c)  A member appointed and qualified under this subsection shall serve until
a successor is elected or appointed and qualified.
(2) (a)  A vacancy on the board shall be filled by an interim appointment,
followed by an election to fill a two-year term if:
(i)  the vacancy on the board occurs, or a letter of resignation is received
by the board, at least 14 days before the deadline for filing a declaration of
candidacy; and
(ii)  two years of the vacated term will remain after the first Monday of
January following the next school board election.
(b)  Members elected under this subsection shall serve for the remaining two
years of the vacated term and until a successor is elected and qualified.
(3)  Before appointing a person to fill a vacancy under this section, the
local school board shall:
(a)  give public notice of the vacancy at least two weeks before the local
school board meets to fill the vacancy;
(b)  identify, in the notice:
(i)  the date, time, and place of the meeting where the vacancy will be
filled; and
(ii)  the person to whom a person interested in being appointed to fill the
vacancy may submit his name for consideration and any deadline for submitting
it.
